Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-610
Licensee; employees; solicitor's certificates; form.

The board shall, upon written application by a licensee and the payment of the fee as set forth in section 45-620 and any processing fee allowed under section 45-605.01, issue solicitor's certificates to employees of the licensee who solicit or collect accounts, which certificates shall be in such form as determined by the board. Such certificates shall entitle the solicitor named in the certificate to solicit and handle, for the licensee named in the certificate, collection agency business, accounts, and claims. Upon the termination of the employment of the solicitor by the licensee, such certificate shall become null and void and shall be returned by such solicitor to the licensee for cancellation by the board.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 14, p. 1598;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,171;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 30.